test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-pichi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - пичи: # Noun  пичи 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     пичи+A+Abs: пичи

     пичи+A+Sg+Nom+Det: пичиез
     пичи+A+Pl+Nom+Det: пичиосыз

     пичи+A+Sg+Ine+Det: пичияз
     пичи+A+Pl+Ine+Det: пичиосаз

     пичи+A+Sg+Ill+Det: пичияз
     пичи+A+Pl+Ill+Det: пичиосаз

     пичи+A+Sg+Ela+Det: пичиысьтыз
     пичи+A+Pl+Ela+Det: пичиосысьтыз

     пичи+A+Sg+Gen+Det: [ ~пичиосызлэн ]
     пичи+A+Pl+Gen+Det: пичиосызлэн
